bg_CS.dic
ꙗдъ/G7	po:noun
агнѧ/NT	po:noun
алдиꙗ/Z5	po:noun
алниꙗ/Z5	po:noun
багърѣница/Z5	po:noun
банꙗ/Z5	po:noun
благодать/G5	po:noun
бласть/G5	po:noun
богꙑнꙗ/Z5	po:noun
боль/G6	po:noun
боязнь/G6S6	po:noun
брань/G6S6	po:noun
букꙑ/T1	po:noun
бурꙗ/Z5	po:noun
власть/G6S6	po:noun
волъ/G7	po:noun
вонѧ/Z4	po:noun
врадꙑ/T1	po:noun
връхъ/G7	po:noun
врѣмѧ/T4	po:noun
вьсь/G6S6	po:noun
вѣдь/G6S6	po:noun
вѣсть/G5	po:noun
гвоздь/G5	po:noun
господь/G6	po:noun
гость/G6Я6	po:noun is:m
грътань/G5S6	po:noun
дeнь/T3	po:noun
десѧть/G6S6	po:noun
домъ/G7	po:noun
дьнь/T3	po:noun
дѣнь/T3	po:noun
жидость/G5	po:noun
жизнь/G6S6	po:noun
жрънꙑ/T1	po:noun
жрѣбѧ/NT	po:noun
заповѣдь/G5S6	po:noun
звѣрь/G6S6	po:noun
землꙗ/Z5	po:noun
змиꙗ/Z5	po:noun
зодиꙗ/Z5	po:noun
зѧть/G5	po:noun
имѧ/T4	po:noun
испꙑть/G6S6	po:noun
испьрѧ/Z4	po:noun
камень/T3	po:noun
клюсѧ/NT	po:noun
корень/T3	po:noun
кость/G5S6	po:noun is:f
кръвь/T2	po:noun
кънѧгꙑнѧ/Z4	po:noun
ладиꙗ/Z5	po:noun
лакъть/G5G6S6	po:noun
ланиꙗ/Z5	po:noun
ледъ/G7	po:noun
лесть/G6S6	po:noun
локꙑ/T1	po:noun
локъвꙑ/T1	po:noun
льгꙑнꙗ/Z5	po:noun
любꙑ/T1	po:noun
людь/KKG6S6	po:noun
мꙑсль/G6S6	po:noun
мꙑшь/G6S6	po:noun
медвѣдь/G6S6	po:noun
млъниѧ/Z4	po:noun
моꙗ/Z5
мощь/G6S6	po:noun
мьсть/G5	po:noun
мѣдь/G5S6	po:noun is:f
неплодꙑ/T1	po:noun
нощь/G6S6	po:noun is:f
овьчѧ/NT	po:noun
огнь/G5	po:noun
осьлѧ/NT
отрочѧ/NT
памѧть/T2S6	po:noun
печать/G6	po:noun
пешь/G5
пламень/T3	po:noun
племѧ/T4	po:noun
плъть/G6S6	po:noun
полъ/G7	po:noun
пръстень/G5	po:noun
пѣснь/G6S6	po:noun
пѧть/G5	po:noun
пѫть/G6S6	po:noun
рѣчь/G6S6	po:noun
рѧдъ/G7	po:noun
сꙑнъ/G7	po:noun
санъ/G7	po:noun
свекрꙑ/T1	po:noun
свободь/T3	po:noun
свѧтꙑнꙗ/Z5	po:noun
скръбь/T2S6	po:noun
смокꙑ/T1	po:noun
степень/T3	po:noun
струꙗ/Z5	po:noun
сѣмѧ/T4	po:noun
сѫдиꙗ/Z5	po:noun
тꙑкꙑ/T1	po:noun
таѧ/Z4	po:noun
тварь/T2S6	po:noun
телѧ/NT	po:noun
тьсть/G6S6	po:noun
хорѫгꙑ/T1	po:noun
хоть/G6S6	po:noun
црькꙑ/T1	po:noun
црьквꙑ/T1	po:noun
цѣлꙑ/T1	po:noun
чинъ/G7	po:noun
чьсть/G5	po:noun
чѧсть/G5	po:noun
ѥлень/T3	po:noun
ѧтрꙑ/T1	po:noun
ѫдоль/G5	po:noun
пажить/G6	po:noun is:f
палeжь/G6	po:noun is:f
пальць/G6	po:noun is:f
печаль/G5	po:noun is:f
печать/G6	po:noun is:f
